grammar/big.grammar.foma
# Basic features
define -syl [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|ʃ|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|t͡ʃ|k|f|b|ʎ|ɡ];
define +cons [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|ʃ|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|ɲ|ʒ|l|v|t͡ʃ|k|f|b|ʎ|ɡ];
define +cont [ð|ɾ|r|β|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|s|ɣ|z|h|e|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|f|u|ʎ|o];
define +son [m|n|ɾ|r|j|a|ɔ|ə|ŋ|h|e|ɲ|w|l|ɛ|i|u|ʎ|o];
define -cont [m|d͡ʒ|n|d|t͡ʃ|ɲ|k|b|t|p|ɡ|ŋ];
define -delrel [m|n|ð|t|p|β|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|k|f|u|b|ɡ|o];
define -lat [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|u|b|ɡ|o];
define +nas [m|ɲ|ŋ|n];
define +voi [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|β|r|j|a|ɔ|ə|ŋ|d|ɣ|z|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|u|b|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define -sg [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|u|b|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define -cg [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|u|b|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define +ant [m|s|v|n|d|z|ð|f|b|l|ɾ|t|p|β|r];
define -cor [m|p|β|j|a|ɔ|ə|ŋ|ɣ|h|e|ɲ|w|v|ɛ|i|k|f|u|b|ɡ|o];
define +lab [m|v|f|w|u|b|p|β];
define -hi [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|t|p|β|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|s|d|z|h|e|ʒ|l|v|ɛ|t͡ʃ|f|b|o];
define -lo [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|t|p|β|j|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|u|b|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define -back [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|t|p|β|j|a|ʃ|s|d|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|f|b|ʎ];
define -round [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|a|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|b|ʎ|ɡ];
define -velaric [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|u|b|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define -long [m|d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|u|b|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define -son [d͡ʒ|s|v|d|ɣ|z|ʃ|t͡ʃ|ʒ|ð|k|f|b|t|p|ɡ|β];
define +delrel [d͡ʒ|t͡ʃ];
define -nas [d͡ʒ|ð|ɾ|t|p|β|r|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ʒ|w|l|v|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|f|u|b|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define -ant [d͡ʒ|j|ɣ|h|t͡ʃ|ɲ|ʒ|k|w|ʎ|ʃ|ɡ|ŋ];
define +cor [d͡ʒ|s|n|d|z|ʃ|t͡ʃ|ʒ|ð|ʎ|l|ɾ|t|r];
define +distr [d͡ʒ|t͡ʃ|ʒ|ð|ʎ|ʃ];
define -lab [d͡ʒ|n|ð|ɾ|t|r|j|a|ɔ|ʃ|ə|ŋ|s|d|ɣ|z|h|e|ɲ|ʒ|l|ɛ|i|t͡ʃ|k|ʎ|ɡ|o];
define -distr [s|n|d|z|l|ɾ|t|r];
define -voi [s|h|ʃ|t͡ʃ|k|f|t|p];
define -strid [β];
define -cons [i|j|a|ɔ|e|w|u|ə|ɛ|o];
define +hi [i|j|ɣ|ɲ|k|w|u|ʎ|ɡ|ŋ];
define +syl [i|a|ɔ|e|u|ə|ɛ|o];
define +lo [a];
define +tense [i|a|e|u|o];
define +back [ɣ|ɔ|k|w|u|ə|ɡ|ŋ|o];
define +round [w|ɔ|u|o];
define -tense [ɔ|ɛ|ə];
define +lat [ʎ|l];
define +strid [f|v];
define alph [a|b|d|d͡ʒ|e|f|h|i|j|k|l|m|n|o|p|r|s|t|t͡ʃ|u|v|w|z|ð|ŋ|ɔ|ə|ɛ|ɡ|ɣ|ɲ|ɾ|ʃ|ʎ|ʒ|β];

# Composite features
define +dor %-syl & [ %+hi | %+lo | %+back ];
define +pal %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %-back ];
define +vel %-syl & [ %-ant & %-cor & %+hi & %-lo & %+back ];
define +plos [ %-son & %-cont & %-delrel ];
define +fric [ %-son & %+cont ];
define +approx [ %+son & %-nas ];
define -approx [ ~%+approx | ɾ ];
define +strid [ʃ | s | z | ʒ];
define +rho [%-syl & %+son & %+cons & %+ant & %+cont & %-lat];

# Inflections
define Inflection %+Masc -> 0, %+Fem -> ə;

# Word final sonorant consonantal deletion, /n r/
# Only on stressed syllables, not following /r/
# Still exceptions:
#   - not monosyllabic?
define TapDeletion ɾ -> 0 || _ .#.;
define NasalDeletion n -> 0 || 1[alph*][\%+rho] _ .#.;

# [ %-approx & %-syl & %+cor & %+son ] -> 0
define SonCorDeletion TapDeletion .o. NasalDeletion;

# Tap becomes a trill before stops.
# Before SonCorDel to acheive:
#   - kəɾ-βu-1ni-fəɾ+Masc -> kəɾ-βu-1ni-fər
# Placing this after InterConFrication to avoid e.g.
#   - ʃəm-1bɛɾɡ+Fem -> ʃəm-1bɛr-ɣə
# but maybe sensitivity to syllable boundary would be more correct?
define PreStopTrill ɾ -> r || _%+plos;

# Sometimes word final rhotic tap becomes trill instead of being deleted
define Trill ɾ -> r || 1[alpha*][%+round] _ .#.;

# Adjacent homorganic cons deletion
define HomCorDeletion [ %-syl & %+cor ] -> 0 || [\%+rho & %+cons & %+cor & %+son ] _ .#.;
define HomDorDeletion [ %-syl & %+dor ] -> 0 || [ %+cons & %+dor & %+son ] _ .#.;

define HomDeletion HomCorDeletion .o. HomDorDeletion;

# Nasal place assimilation
# Also, by specifying -ant we're predicting h and t͡ʃ, but maybe that makes sense.
define AnteriorAssim n -> ɲ || _ [ %-ant ];
define VelarAssim n -> ŋ || _ [ %+vel ];
define NasalPlaceAssim VelarAssim .o. AnteriorAssim;

# Vocalic deletion: vowels followed by word-final vowels are deleted, with a few exceptions.
define VocDeletion [ %+syl & %+back] -> 0 || _ [ %+syl ] .#.;

# Stressed word final lenition of [ ɛ | b ] -> uw
# Has to precede WordFinObstruentDevoicing
define WordFinStressedLenition b -> uw || 1[alph*] _ .#.;

# Needs to go before SonCorDeletion to avoid e.g.
#   - mi-u-1sɛn+Masc    mi-u-1sɛuw
define WordFinStressedLengthening ɛ -> ɛuw || 1[alph*] _ .#.;

# Word final obstruent devoicing
define WordFinObstruentDevoicing ɡ -> k, d -> t, b -> p, z -> s || _ .#.;

# Word final affrication
# [+fric] -> [-cont, +delrel]
define WordFinAffrication ʒ -> t͡ʃ, ð -> d͡ʒ || _ .#.;

# Voiced stops become (continuant) fricatives in between sonorant continuants
# [ %+plos & %+voi ] -> [ %+cont ] || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ]
define InterConFrication ɡ -> ɣ, d -> ð, b -> β || [ %+son & %+cont ] _ [ %+son & %+cont ];

# ɔ -> o when stressed
define StressedVowelHeightening ɛ -> e, ɔ -> o || 1[alph*] _;

define StressedVowelLowering e -> ɛ, o -> ɔ || 1[alph*] _ k s;

# primitive re-syllabification of word ending with attached schwa, when
# preceding phone doesn't follow a stop
define Syllabify0 [ %-syl ] -> %- ... || [\%-][ %+son | %+cont ] _ [%+syl] .#.;
define Syllabify1 [ %+syl ] -> %- ... || [%+syl & %-back] _ .#.;
define Syllabify Syllabify0 .o. Syllabify1;

define glide [ %+son & %+cont & %-cons & %-syl];
define GlideFinalVocalization glide -> i || ɾ _ .#.;

define VelFinalWEpen [%+vel] -> ... w || _ .#.;

#   .o. Inflection
#   .o. NasalPlaceAssim             # never gets a chance, because URs are not really URs
#   .o. Trill
#   .o. Flap
#   .o. StressedVowelHeightening
#   .o. StressedVowelLowering
#   .o. VelFinalWEpen

# WordFinStressedLengthening  # before SonCorDel
# SonCorDeletion              # before HomDeletion
# HomDeletion        
# WordFinStressedLenition     # before WordFinObstruentDevoicing
# WordFinObstruentDevoicing
# WordFinAffrication
# InterConFrication           # before PreStopTrill
# PreStopTrill                
# GlideFinalVocalization
# VocDeletion
# Syllabify

define Grammar Inflection .o. WordFinStressedLengthening .o. TapDeletion .o. NasalDeletion .o. HomDeletion .o. WordFinStressedLenition .o. WordFinObstruentDevoicing .o. WordFinAffrication .o. InterConFrication .o. PreStopTrill .o. GlideFinalVocalization .o. VocDeletion .o. Syllabify0 .o. Syllabify1 .o. StressedVowelLowering;
